src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Harm_Neutr_LUGWMA_PSS-PRC
+Pss+PrfPrc:%>t K ;
+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:%>t K ;
+Err/Dial+Pss+PrfPrc:%>t%{uü%} K ;
+Err/Dial+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:%>t%{uü%} K ;
+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Gen:%>d%{uü%} K ;
+Pss+PrfPrc:%>d%{uü%} Harm_Neutr_COMP ;
+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Par:%>t%{uü%}t K ;
+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Ill:%>t%{uü%}he K ;
 PSS-PRFPRC_PL_NOM_dUq ;
+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Gen:%>t%{uü%}id%{eõ%} K ;
+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Par:%>t%{uü%}id K ;
+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Ill:%>t%{uü%}ihe K ;
+Err/Dial+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Gen:%>t%{uü%}isi K ;
+Err/Dial+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Par:%>t%{uü%}isi K ;
+Err/Dial+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Ill:%>t%{uü%}isihe K ;
!
+Pss+PrsPrc:%>t%{aä%}v K ;
+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom:%>t%{aä%}v K ;
+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Gen:%>t%{aä%}%>v%{aä%} K ;
+Pss+PrsPrc:%>t%{aä%}%>v%{aä%} Harm_Neutr_COMP ;
+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Par:%>t%{aä%}%>v%{aä%}t K ;
+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Ill:%>t%{aä%}%>v%{aä%}he K ;
+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:%>t%{aä%}%>v%{aä%}q K ;
+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Gen:%>t%{aä%}%>vid%{eõ%} K ;
+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Par:%>t%{aä%}%>vit K ;
+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Ill:%>t%{aä%}%>vihe K ;
+Err/Dial+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Gen:%>t%{aä%}%>viid%{eõ%} K ;
+Err/Dial+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Par:%>t%{aä%}%>viid K ;
+Err/Dial+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Ill:%>t%{aä%}%>viihe K ;
+Err/Orth-no-q+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:%>t%{aä%}%>v%{aä%} K ; !!= * @CODE@ no q
!
PSS_IND_SG1_dX ;
PSS_IND_PRS_SG2_tAt ;
+Err/Dial: PSS_IND_PRS_SG2_tAdEq ;
PSS_IND_PRS_SG3_tAs ;
PSS_IND_PRS_PL1_tAmiq ;
PSS_IND_PRS_PL2_tAtiq ;
PSS_IND_PRS_PL3_tAsEq ;

PSS_IND_PRT_SG2_tit ;
+Err/Dial: PSS_IND_PRT_SG2_tidEq ;
PSS_IND_PRT_SG3_ti ;
PSS_IND_PRT_PL1_timiq ;
PSS_IND_PRT_PL2_titiq ;
PSS_IND_PRT_PL3_diq ;
+Err/Dial: PSS_IND_PRT_PL3_tivAq ;

LEXICON PSS_PRC_t_tU_tA
+Pss+PrfPrc:%>t K ;
+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:%>t K ;
+Err/Dial+Pss+PrfPrc:%>t%{uü%} K ;
+Err/Dial+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:%>t%{uü%} K ;
+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Gen:%>d%{uü%} K ;
+Pss+PrfPrc:%>d%{uü%} Harm_Neutr_COMP ;
+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Par:%>t%{uü%}t K ;
+Pss+PrfPrc+Sg+Ill:%>t%{uü%}he K ;
 PSS-PRFPRC_PL_NOM_dUq ;
+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Gen:%>t%{uü%}id%{eõ%} K ;
+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Par:%>t%{uü%}id K ;
+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Ill:%>t%{uü%}ihe K ;
+Err/Dial+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Gen:%>t%{uü%}isi K ;
+Err/Dial+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Par:%>t%{uü%}isi K ;
+Err/Dial+Pss+PrfPrc+Pl+Ill:%>t%{uü%}isihe K ;
!
+Pss+PrsPrc:%>t%{aä%}v K ;
+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom:%>t%{aä%}v K ;
+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Gen:%>t%{aä%}%>v%{aä%} K ;
+Pss+PrsPrc:%>t%{aä%}%>v%{aä%} Harm_Neutr_COMP ;
+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Par:%>t%{aä%}%>v%{aä%}t K ;
+Pss+PrsPrc+Sg+Ill:%>t%{aä%}%>v%{aä%}he K ;
+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:%>t%{aä%}%>v%{aä%}q K ;
+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Gen:%>t%{aä%}%>vid%{eõ%} K ;
+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Par:%>t%{aä%}%>vit K ;
+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Ill:%>t%{aä%}%>vihe K ;
+Err/Dial+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Gen:%>t%{aä%}%>viid%{eõ%} K ;
+Err/Dial+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Par:%>t%{aä%}%>viid K ;
+Err/Dial+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Ill:%>t%{aä%}%>viihe K ;
+Err/Orth-no-q+Pss+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:%>t%{aä%}%>v%{aä%} K ; !!= * @CODE@ no q

LEXICON Harm_Neutr_LOGÕMA_ACT_IND_PRT-SG1
+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: K ;
+Err/Dial+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%>e K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>t K ;
+Err/Dial+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>q K ;
+Err/Dial+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>d%{eõ%}q K ;
+Err/Dial+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>%{eõ%}q K ;
+Err/Dial+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>%{eõ%}t K ;
+Err/Dial+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>%{eõ%}d%{eõ%}q K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>miq K ;
+Err/Dial+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>%{eõ%}miq K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%>tiq K ;
+Err/Dial+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%>%{eõ%}tiq K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>q K ;
+Err/Dial+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>v%{aä%}q K ;
+Err/Dial+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>%{eõ%}q K ;
+Err/Dial+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>%{eõ%}v%{aä%}q K ;

LEXICON TULWMA_ACT_IND_PRT_ZERO_and_X
: ACT_IND_PRT_SG1_ZERO ;
: ACT_IND_PRT_SG2_t ;
+Err/Orth: ACT_IND_PRT_SG2_q ;
: ACT_IND_PRT_SG2_dEq ;
: ACT_IND_PRT_PL1_miq ;
: ACT_IND_PRT_PL2_tiq ;
: ACT_IND_PRT_PL2_dEq ;
: ACT_IND_PRT_PL3_q ;
: ACT_IND_PRT_PL3_vAq ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
